Montana, session 2025, LC2649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-5-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-5-101. Judicial districts defined. In this state, there are 22 21 judicial districts, distributed as
follows:
(1) 1st district: Lewis and Clark and Broadwater Counties;
(2) 2nd district: Silver Bow County;
(3) 3rd district: Deer Lodge, Granite, and Powell Counties;
(4) 4th district: Missoula and Mineral Counties;
(5) 5th district: Beaverhead, Jefferson, and Madison Counties;
(6) 6th district: Park and Sweet Grass Counties;
(7) 7th district: Dawson, McCone, Richland, Prairie, and Wibaux Counties;
(8) 8th district: Cascade County;
(9) 9th district: Teton, Pondera, Toole, and Glacier Counties;
(10) 10th district: Fergus, Judith Basin, and Petroleum Counties;
(11) 11th district: Flathead County;
(12) 12th district: Liberty, Hill, and Chouteau Counties;
(13) 13th district: Yellowstone County;
(14) 14th district: Meagher, Wheatland, Golden Valley, and Musselshell Counties;
(15) 15th district: Blaine, Phillips, Valley, Roosevelt, Daniels, and Sheridan Counties;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2649.1
(16) 16th district: Custer, Carter, Fallon, Powder River, Garfield, Treasure, and Rosebud Counties;
(17) 17th district: Phillips, Blaine, and Valley Counties;
(18)(17)18th 17th district: Gallatin County;
(19)(18)19th 18th district: Lincoln County;
(20)(19)20th 19th district: Lake and Sanders Counties;
(21)(20)21st 20th district: Ravalli County;
(22)(21)22nd 21st district: Stillwater, Carbon, and Big Horn Counties."

Section 2. Section 3-5-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-5-102. Number of judges. In each judicial district, there must be the following number of judges of
the district court:
(1) in the 2nd, 7th, 16th, 20th, and 21st districts, two judges each;
(2) in the 1st, 8th, and 18th districts, four judges each;
(3) in the 4th and 11th districts, five judges each;
(4) in the 13th district, eight nine judges; and
(5) in all other districts, one judge each."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Transition. (1) If a vacancy in the 15th or the 17th judicial district occurs
on or after [the effective date of this section], then:
(a) the governor may not appoint a person to fill the vacancy in the 15th or the 17th judicial district,
and the remaining judge will serve the newly configured 15th judicial district; and
(b) the governor shall appoint a person to fill the additional judge position in the 13th district using
the process outlined in 3-1-901 through 3-1-905. The appointment must be confirmed by the senate and is
subject to the provisions of 3-1-906 for senate confirmation and of 3-1-907 for the length of the appointee's
initial term.
(2) An election to a full 6-year term for the ninth judge in the 13th judicial district must be
conducted at the general election held in November 2030.

- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2649.1
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective dates -- contingent effective date. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2), [this act] is effective on passage and approval.
(2) (a) [Sections 1 and 2] are effective January 6, 2031, or on occurrence of the contingency
described in subsection (2)(b), whichever occurs first.
(b) If a vacancy in the 15th or 17th judicial district occurs on or after [the effective date of this
section], then [sections 1 and 2] are effective on the date the vacancy occurs.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****